New York, session 2025-2026, A5509.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 926 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 926. Hemostatic agents. 1. School districts, boards of cooperative 4 educational services, county vocational education and extension boards, 5 charter schools, and non-public elementary and secondary schools in this 6 state may provide and maintain on-site in each instructional school 7 facility topical hemostatic agents in quantities and types deemed by the 8 commissioner, in consultation with the commissioner of health, to be 9 adequate to ensure ready and appropriate access for use during emergen- 10 cies to any student or staff experiencing excessive bleeding. 11 2. School districts, boards of cooperative educational services, coun- 12 ty vocational education and extension boards, charter schools, and non- 13 public elementary and secondary schools in this state, and any person 14 employed by any such entity or employed by a contractor of such an enti- 15 ty while performing services for the entity, may administer topical 16 hemostatic agents in the event of an emergency. 17 3. School districts, boards of cooperative educational services, coun- 18 ty vocational education and extension boards, charter schools, and non- 19 public elementary and secondary schools in this state that are author- 20 ized to provide and maintain epinephrine auto-injectors on-site pursuant 21 to this section shall provide all teachers with written informational 22 material on the use of topical hemostatic agents that has been created 23 and approved by the commissioner of health. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 25 the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the 26 addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary 27 for the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized 28 to be made and completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05428-01-5